Utah statutes.
54-8c-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Authorized person" means an employee or agent:

(a)  of a public utility that:

(i)  generates, transmits, or delivers electricity; or

(ii)  provides and whose work relates to communication services;

(b)  of an industrial plant whose work relates to the electrical system of the industrial plant;

(c)  of a cable television or communication services company, or of a contractor of cable television or communication services company, if specifically and expressly authorized by the owner of the poles to make cable television or communication services attachments; or

(d)  of a state, county, or municipal agency which has or whose work relates to:

(i)  overhead electrical lines;

(ii)  overhead lighting systems;

(iii)  authorized overhead circuit construction;

(iv)  conductors on poles; or

(v)  structures of any type.

(2)  "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday.

(3)  "High voltage" means voltage in excess of 600 volts measured between:

(a)  conductors; or

(b)  a conductor and the ground.

(4)  "Overhead line" means all bare or insulated electrical conductors installed above the ground.

(5)  "Public utility" means any entity that generates, transmits, or distributes electrical energy, including any:

(a)  public utility as defined in Title 54, Chapter 2;

(b)  municipality as defined in Title 10;

(c)  agricultural cooperative association as defined in Title 3;

(d) improvement district as defined in Section 17B-1-102; or

(e)  entity created pursuant to Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.

(6)  "Responsible party" means any person who contracts to perform, is responsible for the performance of, or has control over, any function or activity at any location.

